Utah statutes.
10-3b-504.   Limitations on adoption of a resolution and filing of a petition.

A resolution may not be adopted under Subsection 10-3b-503(1)(a) and a petition may not be filed under Subsection 10-3b-503(1)(b) within:

(1)  two years after an election at which voters reject a proposal to change the municipality's form of government, if the resolution or petition proposes changing to the same form of government that voters rejected at the election; or

(2)  four years after the effective date of a change in the form of municipal government.



Enacted by Chapter 19, 2008 General Session

